Illinois, session 104th, SB1616.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 52-3.206 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.206 new)7    Sec. 2-3.206. Scheduling guidance for major school events. 8    (a) As used in this Section, "major school event" means a 9school sanctioned or sponsored event that is part of a school 10or school district's locally created school calendar for the 11year, including, but not limited to, events or activities that 12would be difficult for a student to make up.13    (b) The State Board of Education, in consultation with 14stakeholders, shall identify dates during the year of cultural 15or religious significance to the student population and in 16which students may have out-of-school commitments or otherwise 17be unable to participate in a major school event.18    By July 1 of each year, the State Board of Education shall 19prominently post on its website and distribute to each school 20district a nonexhaustive list of the identified days and dates 21of cultural, religious, or other observances for, at a 22minimum, the school year that begins in the next calendar year 23as a resource for making scheduling decisions for major school   SB1616 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 12054 LNS 22149 b1events. The list shall include a statement encouraging schools 2to be mindful of the days and dates of cultural, religious, or 3other observances that impact student participation as schools 4plan major school events.5    (c) The list of cultural, religious, or other observances 6under subsection (b) shall additionally include a statement 7indicating that the list is only for scheduling guidance 8purposes and does not affect a student's right to be excused 9from attendance because of the observance of a religious 10holiday pursuant to Section 26-2b of this Code, regardless of 11whether the religious holiday appears on the list.12    Upon the posting and distribution of the list, the State 13Board of Education shall also inform school districts that the 14list is nonexhaustive and that a school district may include 15additional days and dates on its locally created school 16calendars based on community feedback or demographics.17    The State Board of Education shall additionally distribute 18the list each year to relevant associations or entities as 19determined by the State Board of Education. 20    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 21becoming law.